California, session 20252026, SB512.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 9300 of the Elections Code is amended to read:9300. (a) In addition to any other method provided by law, ordinances may be enacted by any district pursuant to this article, except that this article shall not apply to irrigation districts, to a district formed under a law that does not provide a procedure for elections, to a district formed under a law which does not provide for action by ordinance, to a district governed by an election procedure that permits voters, in electing the district’s directors or trustees, to cast more than one vote per voter, or to a district in which the directors are empowered to cast more than one vote per director when acting on any matter.(b) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the voters of any district that has authorization to impose a transactions and use tax for transportation purposes pursuant to Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code may impose a retail transactions and use tax by an initiative measure enacted pursuant to this article.(2) A transactions and use tax enacted by initiative measure pursuant to paragraph (1) shall not exceed the maximum authorized rate for a tax imposed by an ordinance enacted by the governing body of the district. The initiative measure shall contain all spending limitations and substantive accountability standards applicable to a tax imposed by an ordinance enacted by the governing body of the district, including, but not limited to, the inclusion of a transportation expenditure plan that specifies the purposes for which the revenue derived from the tax will be used, but not including any procedural requirement such as a requirement that the transportation expenditure plan be approved by local agencies.(3) This subdivision is declaratory of existing law. It is the intent of the Legislature, in enacting this subdivision, to implement the guarantee of the people’s power of initiative to affect local taxes pursuant to Section 3 of Article XIII C of the California Constitution.SEC. 2. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.